Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska44-4110.01
Confidential information; disclosure prohibited; exception.

Any data or information pertaining to the diagnosis, treatment, or health of any insured or applicant obtained from such person or from any provider by any preferred provider organization shall be held in confidence and shall not be disclosed to any person except (1) upon the express consent of the insured or applicant, (2) pursuant to statute or court order for the production of evidence or the discovery thereof, or (3) in the event of a claim or litigation between such person and the preferred provider organization in which such data or information is pertinent. A preferred provider organization shall be entitled to claim any statutory privileges against such disclosure which the provider who furnished such information to the preferred provider organization is entitled to claim.

Laws 1990, LB 1136, § 101.